Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2868.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142G.18, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Person convicted of drug offenses. (a) An individual who has been convicted of a felony level drug offense during the previous ten years from the date of application or recertification deleted text begin is subject to the following:deleted text end new text begin may, if otherwise eligible, receive MFIP benefits.new text end deleted text begin (1) Benefits for the entire assistance unit must be paid in vendor form for shelter and utilities during any time the applicant is part of the assistance unit. deleted text end deleted text begin (2) The convicted applicant or participant may be subject to random drug testing. Following any positive test for an illegal controlled substance, the county must provide information about substance use disorder treatment programs to the applicant or participant. deleted text end (b) Applicants requesting only SNAP benefits or participants receiving only SNAP benefits, who have been convicted of a felony-level drug offense during the previous ten years from the date of application or recertification may, if otherwise eligible, receive SNAP benefits. deleted text begin The convicted applicant or participant may be subject to random drug testing. Following a positive test for an illegal controlled substance, the county must provide information about substance use disorder treatment programs to the applicant or participant.deleted text end (c) For the purposes of this subdivision, "drug offense" means a conviction that occurred during the previous ten years from the date of application or recertification of sections 152.021 to 152.025, 152.0261, 152.0262, 152.096, or 152.137. Drug offense also means a conviction in another jurisdiction of the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled substance, or conspiracy to commit any of these offenses, if the conviction occurred during the previous ten years from the date of application or recertification and the conviction is for a crime that would be a felony if committed in Minnesota. (d) This subdivision does not apply for convictions or positive test results related to cannabis, marijuana, or tetrahydrocannabinols. Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256D.024, subdivision 1, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: S2868-1 256D.024 PERSONS PROHIBITED FROM RECEIVING BENEFITS. Subdivision 1. Person convicted of drug offenses. (a) An individual who has been convicted of a felony-level drug offense during the previous ten years from the date of application or recertification may be subject to random drug testing. The county must provide information about substance use disorder treatment programs to a person who tests positive for an illegal controlled substance. (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, "drug offense" means a conviction that occurred during the previous ten years from the date of application or recertification of sections 152.021 to 152.025, 152.0261, 152.0262, or 152.096. Drug offense also means a conviction in another jurisdiction of the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled substance, or conspiracy to commit any of these offenses, if the conviction occurred during the previous ten years from the date of application or recertification and the conviction is for a crime that would be a felony if committed in Minnesota. (c) This subdivision does not apply for convictions or positive test results related to cannabis, marijuana, or tetrahydrocannabinols.